Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-8,196
Licensure applicants; examination; eligibility; requirements.

(1) Applications for licensure as a professional landscape architect shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Landscape Architects.

(2) Applicants who hold a landscape architecture degree accredited by any of the following may sit for the Landscape Architect Registration Examination as administered by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards:

(a) The Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board or its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects; or

(b) The Canadian Society of Landscape Architects or its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects.

(3) The following shall be considered as the minimum evidence satisfactory to the State Board of Landscape Architects that an applicant is eligible for initial licensure, upon application, as a professional landscape architect:

(a) Submission of an application accompanied by the fee established by the board, in accordance with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194;

(b) Graduation from a program accredited by any of the following:

(i) The Landscape Architectural Accreditation Board or its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects; or

(ii) The Canadian Society of Landscape Architects or its equivalent as determined by the State Board of Landscape Architects;

(c) Passage of an examination on technical and professional subjects as prescribed by the board or its equivalent as determined by the board; and

(d) A record of diversified post-degree experience directly related to landscape architecture under the direct supervision of a professional landscape architect in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board.

(4) Upon application, an individual holding a license to practice landscape architecture issued by a proper authority of any jurisdiction recognized by the board, based on credentials that do not conflict with the Professional Landscape Architects Act, may be licensed as a professional landscape architect.

(5) The board may accept the verified information contained in a valid council record issued by the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards in lieu of the same information that is required on the form prescribed by the board.

(6) Any examination material shall not be deemed a public record subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

(7) The board may adopt the examinations and grading procedures of the Council of Landscape Architectural Registration Boards. The board may also adopt guidelines published from time to time by the council.

(8) Licensure shall be effective upon issuance.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 13, p. 1863;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 224;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB30, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB696, § 3.